Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1422
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for credentialing under the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 558.